Hawaii statutes.
§454F-5 Issuance of license. (a) The
commissioner shall not issue a license pursuant to this chapter unless the
commissioner makes at a minimum the following findings:

(1) The applicant, or in the case of an applicant
that is not an individual, each of the applicant's control persons, executive
officers, directors, general partners, and managing members, has never had a
mortgage loan originator or a mortgage loan originator company license revoked
in any jurisdiction; provided that a subsequent formal vacation of a revocation
shall not be deemed a revocation;

(2) The applicant, or in the case of an applicant
that is not an individual, each of the applicant's control persons, executive
officers, directors, general partners, and managing members, has not been
convicted of, or pled guilty or nolo contendere, or been granted a deferred
acceptance of a guilty plea under federal law or under chapter 853 to a felony
in a domestic, foreign, or military court:

(A) During the seven-year period preceding
the date of the application for licensing and registration; or

(B) At any time preceding the date of
application, if the felony involved an act of fraud, dishonesty, breach of
trust, or money laundering;

provided that any pardon of a conviction
shall not be deemed a conviction for purposes of this section;

(3) The applicant, or in the case of an applicant
that is not an individual, each of the applicant's control persons, executive
officers, directors, general partners, and managing members, has demonstrated financial
responsibility, character, and general fitness to command the confidence of the
community and to warrant a determination that the applicant shall operate
honestly, fairly, and efficiently pursuant to this chapter. For purposes of
this paragraph, a person is not financially responsible when the person has
shown a disregard in the management of the person's financial condition. A
determination that a person has shown a disregard in the management of the
person's financial condition may be based on:

(A) Current outstanding judgments, except
judgments solely as a result of medical expenses;

(B) Current outstanding tax liens or other
government liens and filings;

(C) Foreclosures within the past three years;
and

(D) A pattern of seriously delinquent
accounts within the past three years;

(4) The applicant, or in the case of an applicant
that is not an individual, each of the applicant's control persons, executive
officers, directors, general partners, and managing members, has not been
convicted of, [pled] guilty or nolo contendere to, or been granted a deferred
acceptance of a guilty plea under federal law or chapter 853 to any misdemeanor
involving an act of fraud, dishonesty, breach of trust, or money laundering;

(5) The applicant, or in the case of an applicant
that is not an individual, each individual mortgage loan originator who is
employed by the mortgage loan originator company or who provides exclusive
services to the applicant as a mortgage loan originator, has completed the
pre-licensing education requirement described in section 454F-6;

(6) The applicant, or in the case of an applicant that
is not an individual, each individual mortgage loan originator who is employed
by the mortgage loan originator company or who provides exclusive services to
the applicant as a mortgage loan originator, has passed a written test that
meets the test requirements in section 454F-7; and

(7) The applicant has met the mortgage loan recovery
fund requirement as required in section 454F-41.

(b) The applicant, or in the case of an
applicant that is not an individual, each of the applicant's control persons,
executive officers, directors, general partners, and managers, shall submit
authorization to the commissioner for the commissioner to conduct background
checks to determine or verify the information in subsection (a) in each state
where the person has conducted mortgage loan origination activities.
Authorization pursuant to this subsection shall include consent to provide
additional fingerprints, if necessary, to law enforcement or regulatory bodies
in other states. [L Sp 2009, c 32, pt of §2; am L 2010, c 84, §12; am L 2011, c
194, §7; am L 2016, c 122, §8]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next